Washington statutes.
RCW 39.24.050

Purchase of paper products meeting certain specifications required.

A governmental unit shall, to the maximum extent economically feasible, purchase paper products which meet the specifications established by the department of enterprise services under RCW 39.26.255.

[ 2015 c 225 s 40; 1982 c 61 s 3.]

NOTES: